Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-703 Penalties. (a) Any person
who wilfully makes a false or fraudulent statement in or relating to an
application for membership or for the purpose of obtaining money from or a
benefit in any society, shall upon conviction be fined not less than $100 nor
more than $500 or imprisoned for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year, or both.

(b) Any person who wilfully makes a false or
fraudulent statement in any verified report or declaration under oath required
or authorized by this article, or of any material fact or thing contained in a
sworn statement concerning the death or disability of an insured for the
purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate, shall be
guilty of perjury and shall be subject to the penalties therefor prescribed by
law.

(c) Any person who solicits membership for, or
in any manner assists in procuring membership in, any society not licensed to
do business in this State shall upon conviction be fined not less than $50 nor
more than $200.

(d) Any person guilty of a wilful violation
of, or neglect or refusal to comply with, the provisions of this article for
which a penalty is not otherwise prescribed, shall upon conviction, be subject
to a fine not exceeding $200.

(e) All penalties collected pursuant to this
section and section 432:2-108 shall be deposited to the credit of the
compliance resolution fund. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 63, §17]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next